Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201718-3303
State-owned land; effect of annexation.

The extension of the corporate limits of any city or village beyond or around any lands belonging to the State of Nebraska shall not affect the status of such state land.

Laws 1917, c. 101, § 2, p. 267;

C.S.1922, § 4261;

C.S.1929, § 17-410;

R.S.1943, § 17-412;
R.S.1943, (2012), § 17-412;
Laws 2017, LB133, § 314.
August 24, 2017